District of Columbia statutes.
16-908

Relationship not dependent on marriage or domestic partnership.

A child is the legitimate child of any parent under which a parent-child relationship is established pursuant to § 16-909, and is the legitimate relative of its parents’ relatives by blood or adoption and entitled to all rights, privileges, duties, and obligations under the laws of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 561
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 105, 23 DCR 8737
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(c), 56 DCR 4269
1981 Ed., § 16-908.
1973 Ed., § 16-908.
D.C. Law 18-33 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “A child born in wedlock or born out of wedlock is the legitimate child of its father and mother and is the legitimate relative of its father’s and mother’s relatives by blood or adoption.”